Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIV Public Utilities
Special Telephone Services

278.547.
Definitions for KRS 278.547 to 278.5499.

As used in KRS

278.547

to

278.5499

, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Specialized telecommunications equipment” means devices such as, but not limited to telecommunications devices for the deaf, amplified phones, loud ringers, visual alert signalers, tactile signalers, captioned telephones, and appropriate wireless devices.

“Telecommunications relay service” means a procedure by which a deaf, hard-of-hearing, or speech-impaired user of specialized telecommunications equipment can communicate with an intermediary party, who then verbally relays the first party’s message or request to a third party, or vice versa. The service includes, but is not limited to the switching, transmitting, and the voice and typed translation of calls.

“Telecommunications Access Program” means the program to furnish specialized telecommunications equipment to deaf, hard-of-hearing, and speech-impaired persons in order that they may use the telecommunications relay service. The program shall include maintenance and repair of the equipment.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 5, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 144, § 15, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 237, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 2006, ch. 23, § 3, effective July 12, 2006.

278.548.
Telecommunications relay service program.

The commission shall establish a program to make telecommunications relay services available not later than October 1, 1991, and shall make interstate telecommunications relay services available no later than July 1, 1992. The telecommunications relay service, whether intrastate or interstate, shall be operated seven (7) days a week for twenty-four (24) hours per day for all deaf, hard-of-hearing, or speech-impaired telephone subscribers within the Commonwealth. In order to determine the most cost effective method of providing telecommunications relay services that will meet the requirements of the deaf, hard of hearing, and speech-impaired, the commission shall initiate an investigation, conduct public hearings, and solicit the advice and counsel of the deaf, hard-of-hearing persons, and speech-impaired persons and the organizations serving them. The commission may assist the Commission on the Deaf and Hard of Hearing in the TDD distribution program established pursuant to KRS

163.525

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 5, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 93, § 1, effective March 24, 1992; 1992, ch. 144, § 16, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 237, § 2, effective July 15, 1994.

278.549.
Rates — Funding mechanism.

Users of a telecommunications relay service shall pay rates no greater than the rates paid for functionally equivalent voice communication services provided without a telecommunications relay. The commission shall determine the appropriate funding mechanism for the telecommunications relay system. The telecommunications industry shall not be required to absorb the cost of funding the telecommunications relay service. The commission may use assistance from public agencies of the state or federal government or from private organizations to accomplish the purposes of KRS

278.547

to

278.549

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 5, § 3, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 237, § 3, effective July 15, 1994.

278.5499.
Funding mechanism for Telecommunications Access Program.

The Public Service Commission shall determine the appropriate funding mechanism for the Telecommunications Access Program established pursuant to KRS

163.525

. The funding mechanism shall be designed to collect reasonably necessary funds, not to exceed two cents ($0.02) per access line per month, from subscribers of telecommunication utilities. The telecommunications industry shall not be required to absorb the cost of funding the Telecommunications Access Program.

The Public Service Commission shall distribute the funds collected from this funding mechanism to the Commission on the Deaf and Hard of Hearing for the purpose of implementing and operating the Telecommunications Access Program. The secretary of the cabinet to which the Commission on the Deaf and Hard of Hearing is attached by statute or executive order shall establish oversight conditions with the Commission on the Deaf and Hard of Hearing to ensure the funds are being used solely for the purposes consistent with this section and KRS

163.525

.

The Public Service Commission, with the advice of the Commission on the Deaf and Hard of Hearing, shall initiate an investigation, conduct public hearings, and determine the appropriate funding mechanism for the Telecommunications Access Program no later than January 1, 1995. As part of this determination, the commission may review the funding mechanism for the telecommunications relay service pursuant to KRS

278.549

. The commission shall consider whether a telecommunications utility experiences a competitive disadvantage resulting from the funding mechanism when compared to other telecommunication utilities.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 237, § 4, effective July 15, 1994; 2002, ch. 36, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2006, ch. 23, § 4, effective July 12, 2006; 2010 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 2, § 10, effective June 4, 2010.